Oklahoma, session 2026, SB538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 16-112, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 16-112. A. When the municipal governing body shall
deem it advisable, it may, by resolution or ordinance, authorize the
mayor to call a special election on a date established in Section 3-
101 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes for the purpose of
submitting to the registered voters of the municipality the question
of issuing municipal bonds, of granting any franchise, or for any
other purpose authorized by law.
B. Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of submitting to
the registered voters of the municipality the question of issuing
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB538 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

muni cipal bonds or of any tax, the governing body may, by resolution
or ordinance, authorize the mayor to call a special election on a
state or federal election day in November in an odd- or even-
numbered year.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 15-102, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 15-102. The Notwithstanding any other law, the board of
education shall call an election to be held on a state or federal
election day in November in an odd- or even-numbered year, to which
shall be conducted by the county election board in all respects as
other elections, for the purpose of taking the sense of the district
upon the question of issuing such bonds, naming in the proclamation
of such election the amount of bonds to be voted on and the purpose
for which they are to be issued; and it shall cause to be published
in a newspaper of general circulation in said the district the time
and place of such election, such notices to be given at least ten
(10) days before such election. In all instances where
proclamations for elections for boards of education are required by
statute of the mayor of a city, and in all instances where elections
for boards of education are provided for by statute wherein the
mayor and city clerk are denominated, the president of the board of
education shall be substituted for the mayor and the clerk of the
board of education shall be substituted for the city clerk. Boards
of education are hereby declared to be free and independent of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB538 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

citi es in all matters relating to school elections legally called
upon all school matters, and presidents of boards of education shall
have full power to issue proclamations calling school elections;
provided, that no election shall be called on the same proposition
within four (4) months after such proposition has been defeated at
an election by the school district electors. The provisions of this
act section as to the waiting period shall not apply where the
school facilities have been destroyed by an act of God. The cost of
such elections, together with the cost of such proclamations,
publication, notices or other expenses required, shall be legal
costs of boards of education.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB538 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)